Utah statutes.
63M-1-2603.   Government Procurement Private Proposal Program -- Proposals -- Rulemaking.

(1)  There is created within the office the Government Procurement Private Proposal Program.

(2)  In accordance with this part, the board may:

(a)  accept a proposal for a project;

(b)  solicit comments, suggestions, and modifications to a project in accordance with Section 63G-6a-711; and

(c)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing requirements, including time limits for any action required by the affected department, a directly affected state entity or school district, or the Governor's Office of Management and Budget, for the procurement of a project to the extent not governed by Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code.



Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session

